Wisconsin, session 2025, SB546.
do enact as follows:SB546,11Section 1. 753.06 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB546,2,32753.06 (2) (a) Kenosha County. The circuit has 8 branches. Commencing 3August 1, 2028, the circuit has 9 branches.SB546,24Section 2. 753.06 (2) (a) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... 5(this act), is amended to read:SB546,2,76753.06 (2) (a) Kenosha County. The circuit has 8 branches. Commencing 7August 1, 2028, the circuit has 9 branches.SB546,38Section 3. 753.06 (8) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB546,2,109753.06 (8) (a) Brown County. The circuit has 8 branches. Commencing 10August 1, 2027, the circuit has 9 branches.SB546,411Section 4. 753.06 (8) (a) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... 12(this act), section 3, is amended to read:SB546,2,1413753.06 (8) (a) Brown County. The circuit has 8 9 branches. Commencing 14August 1, 2027, 2028, the circuit has 9 10 branches.SB546,515Section 5. 753.06 (8) (a) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... 16(this act), section 4, is amended to read:SB546,3,21753.06 (8) (a) Brown County. The circuit has 9 branches. Commencing 2August 1, 2028, the circuit has 10 branches.SB546,63Section 6. 753.06 (9) (h) of the statutes is amended to read:SB546,3,54753.06 (9) (h) Menominee and Shawano counties Counties. The circuit has 2 5branches. Commencing August 1, 2027, the circuit has 3 branches.SB546,76Section 7. 753.06 (9) (h) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... 7(this act), is amended to read:SB546,3,98753.06 (9) (h) Menominee and Shawano Counties. The circuit has 2 9branches. Commencing August 1, 2027, the circuit has 3 branches.SB546,810Section 8. Nonstatutory provisions.SB546,3,1111(1) Election of circuit judges.SB546,3,1712(a) Brown County. The initial election of the circuit judge for branch 9 of the 13circuit court for Brown County shall be at the spring election of 2027 for a term 14commencing August 1, 2027, and ending July 31, 2033. The initial election of the 15circuit judge for branch 10 of the circuit court for Brown County shall be at the 16spring election of 2028 for a term commencing August 1, 2028, and ending July 31, 172034.SB546,3,2118(b) Menominee and Shawano Counties. The initial election of the circuit judge 19for branch 3 of the circuit court for Menominee and Shawano Counties shall be at 20the spring election of 2027 for a term commencing August 1, 2027, and ending July 2131, 2033.SB546,3,2422(c) Kenosha County. The initial election of the circuit judge for branch 9 of the 23circuit court for Kenosha County shall be at the spring election of 2028 for a term 24commencing August 1, 2028, and ending July 31, 2034.SB546,4,11(2) Circuit judge positions.SB546,4,52(a) Brown County branch 9. The authorized FTE positions for the circuit 3courts are increased by 1.0 GPR circuit judge position on August 1, 2027, to be 4funded from the appropriation under s. 20.625 (1) (a), to provide one circuit judge in 5branch 9 in Brown County.SB546,4,96(b) Brown County branch 10. The authorized FTE positions for the circuit 7courts are increased by 1.0 GPR circuit judge position on August 1, 2028, to be 8funded from the appropriation under s. 20.625 (1) (a), to provide one circuit judge in 9branch 10 in Brown County.SB546,4,1310(c) Menominee and Shawano Counties. The authorized FTE positions for the 11circuit courts are increased by 1.0 GPR circuit judge position on August 1, 2027, to 12be funded from the appropriation under s. 20.625 (1) (a), to provide one circuit judge 13in branch 3 in Menominee and Shawano Counties.SB546,4,1714(d) Kenosha County. The authorized FTE positions for the circuit courts are 15increased by 1.0 GPR circuit judge position on August 1, 2028, to be funded from the 16appropriation under s. 20.625 (1) (a), to provide one circuit judge in branch 9 in 17Kenosha County.SB546,4,1818(3) Court reporter positions.SB546,4,2219(a) Brown County branch 9. The authorized FTE positions for the circuit 20courts are increased by 1.0 GPR court reporter positions on August 1, 2027, to be 21funded from the appropriation under s. 20.625 (1) (a), to provide one court reporter 22in branch 9 in Brown County.SB546,5,223(b) Brown County branch 10. The authorized FTE positions for the circuit 24courts are increased by 1.0 GPR court reporter positions on August 1, 2028, to be 1funded from the appropriation under s. 20.625 (1) (a), to provide one court reporter 2in branch 10 in Brown County.SB546,5,63(c) Menominee and Shawano Counties. The authorized FTE positions for the 4circuit courts are increased by 1.0 GPR court reporter positions on August 1, 2027, 5to be funded from the appropriation under s. 20.625 (1) (a), to provide one court 6reporter in branch 3 in Menominee and Shawano Counties.SB546,5,107(d) Kenosha County. The authorized FTE positions for the circuit courts are 8increased by 1.0 GPR court reporter positions on August 1, 2028, to be funded from 9the appropriation under s. 20.625 (1) (a), to provide one court reporter in branch 9 10in Kenosha County.SB546,5,1411(4) Court system biennial budget request. The 2027-29 biennial budget 12request to the department of administration from the director of state courts for the 13court system shall include funding for the 4 circuit judge positions and 4 circuit 14court reporter positions authorized under subs. (2) and (3).SB546,5,1515(5) Assistant district attorneys positions.SB546,5,2016(a) Assistant district attorneys in 2027. The authorized FTE positions for the 17department of administration are increased by 30.5 GPR positions on July 1, 2027, 18to be funded from the appropriation under s. 20.475 (1) (d), for the purpose of 19increasing the authorized FTE assistant district attorney positions to be 20apportioned as follows to the prosecutorial units for the following counties: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb546 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb546 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB546 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB546 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB546: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting